Mississippi, session 20251E, SB2029.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of the State Department of Agriculture and Commerce's special fund account to the State Department of Agriculture and Commerce for the purposes of defraying the costs of prizes, premiums, judges and other actual and necessary costs of putting on the Dixie National Livestock Show at the State Fairgrounds in Jackson, Mississippi, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026 $     1,200,000.00. SECTION 2.  The following sums, or so much thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund, not otherwise appropriated, to the State Department of Agriculture and Commerce as follows: (a)  For the support of annual roundup shows for junior exhibitors of junior steers, junior breeding cattle, beef cattle, dairy cattle, hogs, sheep and goats, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026........... $     64,890.00. (b)  To supplement the funds paid by the State Department of Agriculture and Commerce for livestock premiums at the State Fair, all livestock premiums to be paid on the American system of judging (1st, 2nd, 3rd, 4th, etc.) on all classes entered in the senior division for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026 $ 22,000.00. (c)  For the county livestock shows in offering and paying prizes or awards to competitors in the approved county livestock shows of Mississippi, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025 and ending June 30, 2026....................................... $     30,000.00. Provided, however, that of the amount herein appropriated in paragraph (c) of this section, not more than Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00) shall be expended or used in any one (1) county of the state during each fiscal year.  Provided, further, that none of the monies herein appropriated in paragraph (c) of this section shall be used in offering or paying prizes or awards for any livestock show that is not held where there are adequate barns, pens, and other facilities available for such a show. Provided, further, in paragraph (c) of this section that the management of such shows shall be in the hands of a county livestock association, and such association shall guarantee a minimum amount of One Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($1,500.00) to be used in the paying of prizes, premiums, or awards, and after said county show has been held and premiums paid, twenty-five percent (25%) of the amount, not exceeding Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), shall be paid upon requisition to the State Department of Agriculture and Commerce. Provided, further, in paragraph (c) of this section that in any county which has two (2) shows with proper facilities, and a contiguous county has no such fair and desires to participate in a fair to be held in an adjoining county, each of the two (2) fairs in one (1) county may receive an equal proportion of the funds hereby appropriated, provided, both shows shall not receive an aggregate sum of more than Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00). (d)  For the purpose of offering awards and prizes to competitors in the five (5) district livestock shows, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026................ ............................................... $ 65,000.00. (e)  For the purpose of offering awards and prizes to competitors in the five (5) state dairy shows as provided in Section 69-5-101 et seq., Mississippi Code of 1972, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026.......................... ............................................... $ 8,500.00. Provided, further, that no part of the money herein appropriated under the provisions of paragraphs (d) and (e) of this section shall be used for any other purpose than to pay premium awards at said shows and state shows and expositions receiving legislative appropriation shall not conflict in dates in order that livestock exhibitors may make the circuit of shows.  Provided, further, that none of the above-mentioned funds shall be paid to any district shows unless shows are held prior to roundup. Not less than seventy-five percent (75%) of the funds herein appropriated under the provisions of paragraphs (d) and (e) of this section shall be used in awarding prizes or premiums to 4-H Club members and Smith-Hughes School members and other boys and girls having entries in said shows. All funds herein appropriated under the provisions of paragraphs (d) and (e) of this section for the five (5) district livestock shows and the five (5) fall state dairy shows shall be distributed in such manner that the livestock exhibitors will each draw equal premium awards for comparable grades and placings at each of the said five (5) district spring shows and the five (5) fall state shows.  The management of each district spring show and each state fall show shall submit to the State Department of Agriculture and Commerce, within fifteen (15) days after the close of each said show, a full report on the number of exhibitors at each said show, with the grades and placings of the different classes of livestock exhibited. The State Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce, together with a committee of three (3) to be named by the President of the Mississippi Livestock Council from that organization, shall summarize and prepare a unified list of awards for like classes in all spring district livestock shows and fall state dairy shows receiving state premium money, as authorized in paragraphs (d) and (e) of this section.  The State Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce shall approve and present a requisition to the State Fiscal Officer for the payment of the amount of funds in paragraphs (d) and (e) of this section due each show and said State Fiscal Officer shall issue his warrant thereon, and it shall be paid by the State Treasurer. Provided, however, as a condition of expenditure of the funds appropriated in paragraphs (d) and (e) of this section, that the board of directors of any district livestock show may, in its discretion, choose to hold its show in the fall instead of the spring. If district shows are held in both spring and fall, then all funds herein appropriated for the five (5) district livestock shows shall be distributed in such a manner that the spring livestock exhibitors will each draw equal premium awards for comparable grades and placings at each district spring show, and the fall livestock exhibitors will each draw equal premium awards for comparable grades and placings at each district fall show. (f)  For promotion and expenses of the winners of the Mississippi High School Rodeo for attending the national finals, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026.... $ 14,150.00. (g)  For promotion and expenses of the winners of the Mississippi Junior High School Rodeo for attending the national finals, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026  $     12,000.00. (h)  For the support of the Southern Cutting Futurity Championship, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026................................... $     50,000.00. SECTION 3.  Of the funds in Section 2 of this act, any funds that are remaining at the end of the fiscal year may be transferred between the different show awards and prize monies, with the exception that no county show in Section 2(c) of this act shall receive more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00). SECTION 4.  It is the intention of the Legislature that whenever two (2) or more bids are received by this agency for the purchase of commodities or equipment, and whenever all things stated in such received bids are equal with respect to price, quality and service, the Mississippi Industries for the Blind shall be given preference.  A similar preference shall be given to the Mississippi Industries for the Blind whenever purchases are made without competitive bids. SECTION 5.  The Mississippi Department of Agriculture and Commerce is authorized to accept and expend any grant, donation, or contribution from any individual, public, or private organization, or government entity for purposes of defraying the operational costs of the department.  Such grants, donations, or contributions shall be received and expended under the rules and regulations of the Department of Finance and Administration in a manner consistent with the escalation of federal funds not to exceed One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00). The Commissioner of Agriculture shall notify, in writing, the Lieutenant Governor, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the Chairman of the Senate Appropriations Committee, the Chairman of the House Appropriations A Committee, and the Legislative Budget Office of any escalation.  The written notification shall include the justification for the escalation of funds, the amount, and how the funds will be used.  This written notification shall be sent on or before the fifteenth day of the month prior to the effective date of the escalation. SECTION 6.  The money herein appropriated shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of the proper fund or funds as set forth in this act, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers in the manner provided by law. SECTION 7.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2025.